Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
DISPOSITIONS, GENERALLY

A. Policy and Planning

§171-32 Policy. Unless otherwise
specifically authorized in this chapter or by subsequent legislative acts, all
dispositions shall be by lease only, disposed of by public auction in
accordance with the procedure set forth in sections 171-14 and 171-16. [L 1962,
c 32, pt of §2; am L 1965, c 239, §4; Supp, §103A-32; HRS §171-32]

Case Notes

Rental of excess transmission capacity in facilities of
Molokai irrigation system did not constitute disposition of public lands. 62
H. 546, 617 P.2d 1208.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next